Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6878XC (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 103.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âNational electrical codeâ means the 3 international energy conservation code, 2009 edition, published 4 by the international code council. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 103.1B Electrical code ââ amendments 6 ââ limitations. 7 Prior to adopting any changes to the national electrical 8 code pursuant to section 103.6, the board shall conduct an 9 analysis of the change in the total cost of the average home 10 built after January 1, 2027, due to any changes to the national 11 electrical code. The analysis shall be submitted to the 12 administrative rules coordinator and the administrative code 13 editor for publication in the Iowa administrative bulletin 14 along with the notice of intended action. 15 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 103.1C International energy 16 conservation code ââ notice. 17 The seller of a single-family dwelling constructed on or 18 after January 1, 2027, shall inform the buyer of the dwelling 19 in writing if the dwelling does not comply with the standards 20 of the international energy conservation code, 2024 edition, 21 published by the international code council. 22 Sec. 4. Section 103.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 23 is amended to read as follows: 24 a. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A and in doing so 25 shall be governed by the minimum standards set forth in the 26 most current publication of the national electrical code issued 27 and adopted by the national fire protection association , and 28 amendments to the code, which code and amendments shall be 29 filed in the offices of the state law library and the board 30 and shall be a public record. The board shall adopt rules 31 reflecting updates to the code and amendments to the code. The 32 board shall promulgate and adopt rules establishing wiring 33 standards that protect public safety and health and property 34 and that apply to all electrical wiring which is installed 35 -1- LSB 6878XC (2) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 S.F. _____ subject to this chapter . 1 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 2 2027. 3